Wisconsin, session 2025, SB810.
do enact as follows:SB810,13Section 1. 45.60 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB810,2,5445.60 (2) Stipends. From the appropriation under s. 20.485 (2) (sm), the 1department shall reimburse a local unit of a member organization of the council on 2veterans programs or a local unit of a veterans organization certified by the 3department to provide military funeral honors for the costs of providing military 4funeral honors in this state to a person described in sub. (1). The reimbursement 5may not exceed $50 $100 for each funeral for which military honors are provided.SB810,2,66